test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-h16_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - : # h_
    skýggj+N+Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef: skýggj
    skýggj+N+Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef: skýggj
    skýggj+N+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef: [skýggi, skýggj]
    skýggj+N+Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef: skýs
    skýggj+N+Neu+Pl+Nom+Indef: skýggj
    skýggj+N+Neu+Pl+Acc+Indef: skýggj
    skýggj+N+Neu+Pl+Dat+Indef: skýggjum
    skýggj+N+Neu+Pl+Gen+Indef: skýggja
    skýggj+N+Neu+Sg+Nom+Def: skýggið
    skýggj+N+Neu+Sg+Acc+Def: skýggið
    skýggj+N+Neu+Sg+Dat+Def: [skýgginum, skýnum]
    skýggj+N+Neu+Sg+Gen+Def: skýsins
    skýggj+N+Neu+Pl+Nom+Def: skýggini
    skýggj+N+Neu+Pl+Acc+Def: skýggini
    skýggj+N+Neu+Pl+Dat+Def: skýggjunum
    skýggj+N+Neu+Pl+Gen+Def: skýggjanna
